Hawaii statutes.
[§708-8301] Habitual unlicensed contracting
activity; felony. (1) A person commits the offense of habitual unlicensed
contracting activity if the person has had two or more convictions within ten
years, preceding the conduct for which the person is charged under this section,
for unlicensed contracting activity in violation of section 436B-27 or 708-8300,
and:

(a) Engages in any activity for which a contractor's
license is required under chapter 444, and is not licensed as a contractor
under chapter 444 when engaging in the activity; or

(b) Uses any word, title, or representation to
induce the false belief that the person is licensed under chapter 444 to engage
in contracting activity.

(2) A conviction for purposes of this section
is a judgment on a verdict, a finding of guilt, or a judgment on a plea of
guilty or nolo contendere. The convictions shall have occurred on separate
dates and be for separate incidents on separate dates. At the time of the
instant offense, the convictions shall not have been expunged by pardon,
reversed, or set aside.

(3) Habitual unlicensed contracting activity
is a class C felony.

(4) It is an affirmative defense to a
prosecution under this section that the defendant was a licensed contractor performing
activity outside the scope of the defendant's contractor's license. This
defense shall not preclude any administrative or civil enforcement action for
the unlicensed activity. [L 2012, c 244, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next